Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 815.140 is amended to read:
815.140. (1) A person commits the offense of  failure to use vehicle traction tires or chains if the
person drives or moves or owns and causes or knowingly permits to be driven or moved any  motor
vehicle or trailer on any highway if the highway is posted showing  conditions that require vehicle
traction tires or chains and the vehicle is not equipped with vehicle traction tires or chains  that
are required for the posted conditions.
(2) Traction tires or chains that are referred to in this section are those established  by rule
under the authority granted under ORS 815.045.
(3) This section does not apply to vehicles exempted from this section under ORS 815.145.
(4) This section only applies to sections of highway on which a road authority requires the  use
of traction tires or chains and on  which signs requiring the use of traction tires or chains have been
posted as provided in ORS 815.045.
(5) A court may not find  a person to be in violation of the offense described under this section
if the court determines that the conditions of the highway at the time the person was cited did  not
require posting under rules adopted under ORS 815.045. The defense under this  subsection may be
affirmatively asserted by any person cited for violation of the offense described in this section.
[(6) The offense described in this section, failure to use vehicle traction tires or chains,  is a specific
fine traffic violation. The presumptive fine for failure to use vehicle traction tires or chains is $880. ]
(6) Except as provided in  subsection (7) of this section, the offense described in this
section, failure to use vehicle traction tires or chains, is a Class C traffic violation.
(7) Failure to use vehicle traction tires or chains is a specific fine traffic violation if  the
person was operating a motor vehicle registered under ORS chapter 826 at  the time of the
offense. The presumptive fine for failure to use vehicle traction tires or chains is $880.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 815.140 by section 1 of this  2022 Act apply to of-
fenses committed on or after the effective date of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 3. ORS 802.093 is repealed.
SECTION 4. The repeal of ORS 802.093 by  section 3 of this 2022 Act applies to citations
issued on or after the operative date specified in section 6 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 5.  ORS 320.435 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1558 (SB 1558-A) Page 1
320.435. (1) The Department of Revenue shall deposit all revenue collected from the privilege tax
imposed under ORS 320.405 and the use tax imposed under ORS 320.410  in a suspense account es-
tablished under ORS  293.445 for the purpose of receiving the revenue. The department may pay ex-
penses for the administration and enforcement of the privilege and use taxes out  of moneys received
from the privilege and use taxes.  Amounts necessary to pay administrative and enforcement ex-
penses are continuously appropriated to the department from the suspense account.
(2) After payment of administrative and enforcement expenses under subsection (1)  of this sec-
tion and refunds or credits arising from  erroneous overpayments, the department shall transfer the
balance of the moneys received from the privilege and use taxes as follows:
(a) Moneys attributable to the privilege tax shall be transferred as follows:
(A) The greater  of  $12 million or 45 percent of the gross amount of the moneys received
from the  privilege tax  shall be transferred annually to the Zero-Emission Incentive Fund estab-
lished under ORS 468.449.
(B) After the transfer required under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the  balance of the
moneys shall be transferred to the Connect Oregon Fund established under ORS 367.080.
(b) Moneys attributable to the use tax shall be transferred to the State Highway Fund.
SECTION 6.
The amendments to ORS 320.435  by section 5 of this 2022 Act and the repeal
of ORS 802.093 by section 3 of this 2022 Act, become operative on January 1, 2023.
SECTION 7. This 2022 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2022
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate February 21, 2022
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House February 23, 2022
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1558 (SB 1558-A) Page 2